src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Verbs
This lists verbs as presented in the grammar.

**LEXICON Verbs** is the lexicon, containing the verb list

## Auxiliaries

hin+V: HIN ; copula
vaa+V: VAA "tulla" ; tulla

## Lexical verbs

### Consonant stems

#### (a) Other than r-stems, primary verbs

6.23 (b) d-preteriti, stem -l-
* bollela+V:boll BOLL "kastaa" ; 
* spillela+V:spill BOLL "pistää" ;

6.23 (b) d-preteriti, stem -v-
* tšuuvela+V:tšuu TSUUV "laittaa" ;

* traadela+V:traad TRAAD "ajaa" ;

* baȟȟela+V:baȟȟ BAHH "pyytää" ;

* mekkela+V:mekk MEKK "jättää";

* dela+V:d D "antaa" ;

#### (b) r-stems, primary verbs

6.23 (a) d-preteriti, stem -r-
* tšerra+V:tšeer TSEER "tehdä" ;
* perra+V:peer TSEER "kaataa" ;

* lurrela+V:lurr LURR "" ;
* kurrela+V:kurr LURR "tapella" ;

#### id past tense
6.24 stem b, d, t, id past tense
* džamba+V:džamb DZAMB "laulaa" ;
* khanda+V:khand DZAMB "haista" ;

6.24 stem -n-, past tens -id
* džaan+V:džaan DZAMB "tietää" ;
* dann+V:kann DZAMB "totella" ;

6.26 t past tense

* baȟȟ+V:baȟȟ BAHH "pyytää" ;
* beȟȟ+V:beȟȟ BAHH "istua" ;

6.27 Stem -g, -k, past tense l
* mang+V:mang MANG "pyytää" ; ! mangl-

* mukk+V:mukk DIKK "jättää" ; dikl, dikn
* dikk+V:dikk DIKK "nähdä" ;

* kamm+V:kamm KAMM "haluta" ; kaml
* aan+V:ann KAMM "tuoda" ;

#### Transitive derivatives

* rakkavela+V:rakk RAKKAVELA "puhua" ;
* phagarvela+V:phag PHAGARVELA "rikkoa" ;

#### Intransitive derivatives

* garuvela+V:gar GARUVELA "piiloutua" ;
* agurvela+V:ag AGURVELA "loppua" ; chech this XXX

### Vowel stem, primary verbs

* džala+V:dž DZA "mennä" ;
* ȟala+V:ȟ DZA "syödä" ;
* sala+V:s DZA "nauraa" ;
* pila+V:pi PILA "juoda" ;
* lila+V:li PILA "ottaa, saada" ;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-rmf/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
